src-fst-morphology-stems-noun_header.lexc.md
Test lemma/stem set for nouns according the new cwd FST

LEXICON NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS
! Animate Dependent Noun stems
masakay:asakay NAD "skin" ;
mitâs:tâs NAD "pair of pants" ; ! AEW NDA-1 (Consonant initial regular stem)
mispan:span NAD "lung" ; ! AEW NDA-1 (Vowel initial regular stem) note that in 3rd person the w- does not surface
mitihtihkosiy:tihtihkosiy NAD "kidney" ; ! AEW NDA-2 (Consonant initial regular VG stem) N.B. also occurs as the stems tihtikosiw and tihtikos (the latter is an NDI-1 declension)
maskasiy:askasiy NAD "finger nail/claw" ; ! AEW NDA-2 (Vowel Initial VG stem) 
! Inanimate Dependent Noun stems
mihtawakay:htawakay NID "ear" ;
mispiton:spiton NID "arm" ;
miyaw:iyaw2 NID ;
mitîh:tîh NID "heart" ; ! AEW NDI-1 (Consonant Initial Regular stem)
mîpit:îpit NID "tooth" ; ! AEW NDI-1 (Vowel Initial Regular stem)
miskotâkay:skotâkay NID "coat/dress" ; ! AEW NDI-2 (Consonant Initial VW stem)
mîstakay:îstakay NID "hair" ; ! AEW NDI-1 (Vowel Initial VW stem)
miskîsik:skîsikw NID "eye" ; ! AEW NDI-3 (Consonant Initial Cw stem)
mathakask:athakaskw NID "palate" ; ! AEW NDI-3 (Vowel Initial Cw stem)
@P.number.SG@mîni:@P.number.SG@în NID_SG/I "bone-marrow" ; ! AEW NDI-4 (Vowel Initial Single Syllable NDI-4 stem) N.B. might cause issue with <î>, also is a mass noun that is never plural.

LEXICON NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS
nîwas:îwat3 NID "sacred bundle" ; ! AEW NID Irregular(?) VW single-syllable stem. N.B. T->s when word final. (can't be PxX)
nôhkom:ohkom NAD "grand-mother" ;
nôhtawiy:ôhtawiy NAD "father" ;
nitânis:tânis NAD "daughter, brother, sister" ;
ninîkihik:nîkihikw NAD "parent" ; ! AEW NDA-3 (Consonant initial Vw stem) Deal later: can also be the stem <wiyihkw> or <iyihkw>. <wiyihkw> and <iyihkw> can occur in locative. The <nîkihik> can not.
nîtim:îtimw NAD "cross-cousin of opposite gender" ; ! AEW NDA-3 (Cowel initial Vw stem).
nîwa:îw2 NAD_SG/A "wife" ; ! AEW NDA-4 (Vowel initial sing syllable NDA-4 stem). N.B. Only one of its type.
@P.loc.NULL@nîskwa:@P.loc.NULL@îskw NAD_SG/A "fellow wife; husband's ex" ; ! AEW NDA-4w (Vowel initial single-syllable-/w/ stem). N.B. Only one of its type. Cannot take the locative (marked here with a flag-diacritic, which could be incorporated in a new set of NON-LOC contlexes).

! Non-kinship dependent noun(s) which do not take PxX
nîki:îk NID_SG/I "home" ; ! AEW NDI-4 (Vowel Initial Single Syllable NDI-4 stem) N.B. Doesn't usually work unpossessed or plural unless distributive.

LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_STEMS
!
! Independent NA AEW to FST conversion
! NA-1, NA-2 -> NA
! NA-3 -> NA + stem-final -w
! NA-4, NA-4w -> NA_SG/A_POSS/IM -w2, y4 (immutable)
!
! Independent NI AEW to FST conversion
! NI-1, NI-2 -> NI
! NI-3 -> NI + -w (stem)
! NI-4, NI-4w -> NI_SG/I_POSS/IM, with w2, y4 for the immutable final glides
!
Test case wug stems
(marked with +Err/Dummy so that they may be eventually removed)
mamam+Err/Dummy:mamam NA ;
papap+Err/Dummy:papap NA_POSS/IM ;
pipip+Err/Dummy:pipip NA_POSS/IM2 ;
tatat+Err/Dummy:tatat NA_DIM/IS ;
titit+Err/Dummy:titit NA_DIM/ISIS ;
nanan+Err/Dummy:nanan NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
ninin+Err/Dummy:ninin NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;
kikik+Err/Dummy:kikik NA_POSS/IM2_DIM/IS ;
kakak+Err/Dummy:kakak NA_POSS/IM2_DIM/ISIS ;
wawâs+Err/Dummy:wawâs NA_DIM/DIM ;
! mam+Err/Dummy:mam NA_SG/A ;
! mim+Err/Dummy:mim NA_SG/I ;
nan+Err/Dummy:nan NA_SG/A_POSS/IM ;
nin+Err/Dummy:nin NA_SG/I_POSS/IM ;
pap+Err/Dummy:pap NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
pip+Err/Dummy:pip NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;

Animate Noun stems
pahkwîsikan NA_POSS/IM "bannock" ; ! AEW NA-1 (Consonant-Initial Regular NA Stem)
asikan NA "sock" ; ! AEW NA-1 (Vowel-Initial Regular NA Stem)
kihc-ôkiniy NA "tomato" ; ! AEW NA-2 (Consonant-Initial Vowel-Glide NA Stem)
athapiy NA "net" ; ! AEW NA-2 (Vowel-Initial Vowel-Glide NA Stem)
kwâpahikan NA "ladle" ; ! AEW NA-1 (Consonant-Initial Regular NA Stem)
masinahikanâhtik:masinahikanâhtikw NA "pencil" ; ! AEW NA-3 (Consonant-Initial Consonant-/w/ NA Stem)
askihk:askihkw NA_POSS/IM "kettle, pail" ; ! AEW NA-3 (Vowel-Initial Consonant-/w/ NA Stem)
niska:nisk NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "goose" ; ! AEW NA-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
sihti:siht NA_SG/I_POSS/IM "spruce" ; ! AEW NA-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
îsa:îs NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "clam; shell" ; ! AEW NA-4 (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
wâhkwa:wâhkw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "roe, fish eggs; lump of roe" ; ! AEW NA-4w (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NA Stem)
ihkwa:ihkw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "louse" ; ! AEW NA-4w (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NA Stem)
! ! Non-AEW NA test cases
! âmow NA_POSS/IM "bee" ;
! maskwa:maskw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "bear" ;
! sîsîp NA_POSS/IM "duck" ;
! Inanimate Noun stems
askiy NI "land" ;
cîmân NI "canoe" ; ! AEW NI-1 (Consonant-Initial Regular NI Stem)
astotin NI "hat" ; ! AEW NI-1 (Vowel-Initial Regular NI Stem)
maskihkiy NI "medicine" ; ! AEW NI-2 (Consonant-Initial VW NI Stem)
mîkisasâkay NI "beaded coat, beaded dress" ; ! AEW NI-2 (Consonant-Initial VW NI Stem)
oskasâkay NI "new coat, new dress" ; ! AEW NI-2 (Vowel-Initial VW NI Stem)
! pahkîkin:pahkîkinw NI "leather, rawhide" ; ! AEW NI-3 (Consonant-Initial Cw NI Stem)
kotawânâpisk:kotawânâpiskw NI ; ! AEW NI-3 (Consonant-Initial Cw NI Stem)
nipîwikamik:nipîwikamikw NI ; ! AEW NI-3 (Consonant-Initial Cw NI Stem)
! askîkin:askîkinw NI "fresh rawhide" ; ! AEW NI-3 (Vowel-Initial Cw NI Stem)
wâwi:wâw2 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM "egg" ; ! AEW NI-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NI Stem)
osk-âyi:osk-ây4 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM "new item, new thing" ; ! AEW NI-4 (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable NI Stem)
@P.number.SG@misko:@P.number.SG@miskw NI_SG/I_POSS/IM "blood" ; ! AEW NI-4w (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NI Stem)
! Irregular stem cases
! Suppletive atimw-/-têm-
@R.person.NULL@atim:@R.person.NULL@atimw NA "dog, beast of burden" ; ! Regular stem of 'atim': 'atimw' (cannot be possessed)
@D.person.NULL@atim:@D.person.NULL@tîm NA "dog, beast of burden" ;   ! Irregular suppletive stem of 'atim': '-tîm' (must be possessed)
Semi-suppletive kîhtî-aya/kîhcî-aya ! This is not part of the latest AEW noun paradigm sets, so probably should be excluded
! @R.person.NULL@kîhtî-aya:@R.person.NULL@kîhtî-ay4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "elder" ; ! AEW NA-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
! @D.person.NULL@kîhtî-aya:@D.person.NULL@kîhcî-ayim NA "elder" ; ! AEW NA-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
kîhtî-aya:kîhtî-ay4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM ; ! AEW NA-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
Regular/Irregular ôsi- both a regularly inflecting stem, and a number of irregular forms enumerated separately
ôsi:ôs NI_SG/I_POSS/IM "canoe, boat" ; ! AEW NI-4 (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable irregular NI Stem)
! Subset of lexicalized Diminutive Animate Independent stems
@P.dim.DIM@ NOUN_INDEP_DIM_STEMS ;

! Sub-continuation lexicon for lexicalized diminutive stems
LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_DIM_STEMS
acimos NA "puppy" ; !
ôcisis NI "small canoe" ; !

Complete extraction of lemma:stem info from LLR dictionary 2022, according to
LEXC structure in the new cwd FST.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/noun_header.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-cwd/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/noun_header.lexc)</small>
